Montana, session 2025, SB324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 44-1-504, MCA, is amended to read:
" 44-1-504. (Temporary) Special revenue account to partially fund highway patrol officers'
salaries expenses. (1) There is an account in the state special revenue fund provided for in 17-2-102.
(2) The money in the account is for the department of justice to fund, pursuant to 2-18-303 (5):
(a) the base salary and associated operating costs for highway patrol officer positions; and
(b) biennial salary increases for highway patrol officers; and
(c) other operating expenses of the highway patrol.
(3) (a) By August 15, 2021, the state treasurer shall transfer $4 million from the account to the
highway patrol officers' retirement pension trust fund.
(b) By August 15, 2022, the state treasurer shall transfer $2 million from the account to the
highway patrol officers' retirement pension trust fund.
(4)(3) Starting July 1, 2023, and in of each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer
$500,000 from the account to the highway patrol officers' retirement pension trust fund by August 15.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 324

Amendment - 1st Reading-white - Requested by: Conference Committee on SB 324
- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 Drafter: Megan Moore, SB0324.003.003
(Terminates on occurrence of contingency--sec. 3, Ch. 472, L. 2021.)
44-1-504. (Effective on occurrence of contingency) Special revenue account to partially fund
highway patrol officers' salaries expenses. (1) There is an account in the state special revenue fund
provided for in 17-2-102.
(2) The money in the account is for the department of justice to fund, pursuant to 2-18-303(5):
(a) the base salary and associated operating costs for highway patrol officer positions; and
(b) biennial salary increases for highway patrol officers; and
(c) other expenses of the highway patrol."

Section 2. Section 61-3-112, MCA, is amended to read:
"61-3-112. Motor vehicle division administration state special revenue account. (1) There is an
account in the state special revenue fund established by 17-2-102 to be known as the motor vehicle division
administration account.
(2) Administrative fees collected on behalf of the motor vehicle division pursuant to 61-3-111 must
be deposited in the account.
(2) Administrative fees collected on behalf of the motor vehicle division pursuant to 61-3-111 must
be deposited in the account.
(3)(2)(3) Fees collected based on the manufacturer's suggested retail price pursuant to 61-3-
321(2) and (7) and allocated pursuant to 61-3-321(23) are deposited in this account."

Section 3. Section 61-3-321, MCA, is amended to read:
"61-3-321. Registration fees of vehicles and vessels -- certain vehicles exempt from
registration fees -- disposition of fees -- definition. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section,
registration fees must be paid upon registration or, if applicable, renewal of registration of motor vehicles,
snowmobiles, watercraft, trailers, semitrailers, and pole trailers as provided in subsections (2) through (20).
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(b), unless a light vehicle is permanently registered
under 61-3-562, the annual registration fee for light vehicles, trucks, and buses that weigh 1 ton or less and for
logging trucks that weigh 1 ton or less is as follows:
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 324

Amendment - 1st Reading-white - Requested by: Conference Committee on SB 324
- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 Drafter: Megan Moore, SB0324.003.003
(i) if the vehicle is 4 or less years old, $217;
(ii) if the vehicle is 5 through 10 years old, $87; and
(iii) if the vehicle is 11 or more years old, $28.
(b) For Subject to subsection (24), for FOR a light vehicle with a manufacturer's suggested retail
price of more than $150,000 $200,000 $150,000 that is 10 years old or less, the annual registration fee is the
amount provided for in subsection (2)(a) plus:
(i) prior to January 1, 2026, $825.
(ii) beginning January 1, 2026:
(A) the amount of 1% of the manufacturer’s suggested retail price $1,000 THE AMOUNT OF 1% OF
THE MANUFACTURER'S SUGGESTED RETAIL PRICE for the first year of registration in the state; and
(I) for a light vehicle with a manufacturer's suggested retail price of more than $150,000 and less
than $600,000, $1,300 for the first year of registration in the state;
(II) for a light vehicle with a manufacturer's suggested retail price of $600,000 or more and less
than $900,000, $3,000 for the first year of registration in the state; and
(III) for a light vehicle with a manufacturer's suggested retail price of $900,000 or more, $5,000 for
the first year of registration in the state;
(B) $825 a year for each year thereafter until the vehicle is 11 years old or older.
(3) (a) Except as provided in subsections (3)(b) and (15), the one-time registration fee based on
the declared weight of a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is as follows:
(i) if the declared weight is less than 6,000 pounds, $61.25; or
(ii) if the declared weight is 6,000 pounds or more, $148.25.
(b) For a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer that is registered under 61-3-701, the annual registration
fee based on the declared weight is as follows:
(i) if the declared weight is less than 6,000 pounds, $30; or
(ii) if the declared weight is 6,000 pounds or more, $60.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (15), the one-time registration fee for motor vehicles owned
and operated solely as collector's items pursuant to 61-3-411, based on the weight of the vehicle, is as follows:
(a) 2,850 pounds and over, $10; and
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 324

Amendment - 1st Reading-white - Requested by: Conference Committee on SB 324
- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 Drafter: Megan Moore, SB0324.003.003
(b) under 2,850 pounds, $5.
(5) (a) Except as provided in subsections (5)(b) and (15), the one-time registration fee for off-
highway vehicles other than a quadricycle or motorcycle is $61.25.
(b) Whenever a valid summer motorized recreation trail pass issued pursuant to 23-2-111 is
affixed to an off-highway vehicle other than a quadricycle or motorcycle, the one-time registration fee is $41.25.
(6) The annual registration fee for heavy trucks, buses, and logging trucks in excess of 1 ton is
$22.75.
(7) (a) Except as provided in subsection (7)(c), the annual registration fee for a motor home, based
on the age of the motor home, is as follows:
(i) less than 2 years old, $282.50;
(ii) 2 years old and less than 5 years old, $224.25;
(iii) 5 years old and less than 8 years old, $132.50; and
(iv) 8 years old and older, $97.50.
(b) The owner of a motor home that is 11 years old or older and that is subject to the registration
fee under this section may permanently register the motor home upon payment of:
(i) a one-time registration fee of $237.50;
(ii) unless a new set of license plates is being issued, an insurance verification fee of $5, which
must be deposited in the account established under 61-6-158;
(iii) if applicable, five times the renewal fees for personalized license plates under 61-3-406; and
(iv) if applicable, the donation fee for a generic specialty license plate under 61-3-480 or a
collegiate license plate under 61-3-465.
(c) For Subject to subsection (24), for FOR a motor home with a manufacturer's suggested retail
price of more than $300,000 $400,000 $300,000 that is 10 years old or less, the annual registration fee is the
amount provided in subsection (7)(a) plus:
(i) before January 1, 2026, $800.
(ii) beginning January 1, 2026:
(A) the amount of 1% of the manufacturer’s suggested retail price $950 THE AMOUNT OF 1% OF THE
MANUFACTURER'S SUGGESTED RETAIL PRICE for the first year of registration in the state; and
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 324

Amendment - 1st Reading-white - Requested by: Conference Committee on SB 324
- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 Drafter: Megan Moore, SB0324.003.003
(I) for a motor home with a manufacturer's suggested retail price of more than $300,000 and less
than $600,000, $1,300 for the first year of registration in the state;
(II) for a motor home with a manufacturer's suggested retail price of $600,000 or more and less
than $900,000, $3,000 for the first year of registration in the state; and
(III) for a motor home with a manufacturer's suggested retail price of $900,000 or more, $5,000 for
the first year of registration in the state;
(B) $825 $800 $825 a year for each year thereafter until the vehicle is 11 years old or older.
(8) (a) (i) Except as provided in subsections (8)(b), (8)(c), and (15), the one-time registration fee for
motorcycles and quadricycles registered for use on the public highways is $53.25, the one-time registration fee
for motorcycles and quadricycles registered for off-highway use is $53.25, and the one-time registration fee for
motorcycles and quadricycles registered for both off-road use and for use on the public highways is $114.50.
(ii) An additional fee of $16 must be collected for the registration of each motorcycle or quadricycle
as a safety fee, which must be deposited in the state motorcycle safety account provided for in 20-25-1002.
(b) (i) The annual registration fee for motorcycles and quadricycles registered for use on the public
highways under 61-3-701 is $44.
(ii) The annual registration fee for motorcycles and quadricycles registered for off-highway use
under 61-3-701 is $44.
(iii) The annual registration fee for motorcycles and quadricycles registered for both off-road use
and for use on the public highways under 61-3-701 is $88.
(iv) An additional safety fee of $7 must be collected annually for each motorcycle or quadricycle
registered under 61-3-701. The safety fee must be deposited in the state motorcycle safety account provided
for in 20-25-1002.
(c) Whenever a valid summer motorized recreation trail pass issued pursuant to 23-2-111 is
affixed to a motorcycle or quadricycle, the one-time registration fee for motorcycles and quadricycles registered
for:
(i) use on the public highways is $33.25; and
(ii) both off-road use and for use on the public highways is $94.50.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (15), the one-time registration fee for travel trailers, based on
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 324

Amendment - 1st Reading-white - Requested by: Conference Committee on SB 324
- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 Drafter: Megan Moore, SB0324.003.003
the length of the travel trailer, is as follows:
(a) under 16 feet in length, $72; and
(b) 16 feet in length or longer, $152.
(10) Except as provided in subsection (15), the one-time registration fee for a motorboat, sailboat,
personal watercraft, or motorized pontoon required to be numbered under 23-2-512 is as follows:
(a) for a personal watercraft or a motorboat, sailboat, or motorized pontoon less than 16 feet in
length, $65.50;
(b) for a motorboat, sailboat, or motorized pontoon at least 16 feet in length but less than 19 feet in
length, $125.50; and
(c) for a motorboat, sailboat, or motorized pontoon 19 feet in length or longer, $295.50.
(11) (a) Except as provided in subsections (11)(b), (11)(c), and (15), the one-time registration fee for
a snowmobile is $60.50.
(b) Whenever a valid winter trail pass issued pursuant to 23-2-636 is affixed to a snowmobile, the
one-time registration fee is $40.50.
(c) (i) A snowmobile that is licensed by a Montana business and is owned exclusively for the
purpose of daily rental to customers is assessed:
(A) a fee of $40.50 in the first year of registration; and
(B) if the business reregisters the snowmobile for a second year, a fee of $20.
(ii) If the business reregisters the snowmobile for a third year, the snowmobile must be
permanently registered and the business is assessed the registration fee imposed in subsection (11)(a).
(12) (a) The one-time registration fee for a low-speed electric vehicle is $25.
(b) The one-time registration fee for a golf cart that is owned by a person who has or is applying for
a low-speed restricted driver's license is $25.
(c) The one-time registration fee for golf carts authorized to operate on certain public streets and
highways pursuant to 61-8-391 is $25. Upon receipt of the fee, the department shall issue the owner a decal,
which must be displayed visibly on the golf cart.
(13) (a) Except as provided in subsection (13)(b), a fee of $12 must be collected when a new set of
standard license plates, a new single standard license plate, or a replacement set of special license plates
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – SB 324

Amendment - 1st Reading-white - Requested by: Conference Committee on SB 324
- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 Drafter: Megan Moore, SB0324.003.003
required under 61-3-332 is issued. The fee imposed under this subsection (13)(a) does not apply when
previously issued license plates are transferred under 61-3-335. All registration fees imposed under this section
must be paid if the vehicle to which the plates are transferred is not currently registered.
(b) An additional fee of $16 must be collected if a vehicle owner elects to keep the same license
plate number from license plates issued before January 1, 2010, when replacement of those plates is required
under 61-3-332(3).
(c) The fees imposed in this subsection (13) must be deposited in the account established under
61-6-158, except that $2 of the fee imposed in subsection (13)(a) must be deposited in the state general fund.
(14) The provisions of this part with respect to the payment of registration fees do not apply to and
are not binding upon motor vehicles, trailers, semitrailers, snowmobiles, watercraft, or tractors owned or
controlled by the United States of America or any state, county, city, or special district, as defined in 18-8-202,
or to a vehicle or vessel that meets the description of property exempt from taxation under 15-6-201(1)(a),
(1)(d), (1)(e), (1)(g), (1)(h), (1)(i), (1)(k), (1)(l), (1)(n), or (1)(o), 15-6-203, or 15-6-215, except as provided in 61-
3-520.
(15) Whenever ownership of a trailer, semitrailer, pole trailer, off-highway vehicle, motorcycle,
quadricycle, travel trailer, motor home, motorboat, sailboat, personal watercraft, motorized pontoon,
snowmobile, motor vehicle owned and operated solely as a collector's item pursuant to 61-3-411, or low-speed
electric vehicle is transferred, the new owner shall title and register the vehicle or vessel as required by this
chapter and pay the fees imposed under this section.
(16) A person eligible for a waiver under 61-3-460 is exempt from the fees required under this
section.
(17) Except as otherwise provided in this section, revenue collected under this section must be
deposited in the state general fund.
(18) The fees imposed by subsections (2) through (12) are not required to be paid by a dealer for
the enumerated vehicles or vessels that constitute inventory of the dealership.
(19) (a) Unless a person exercises the option in either subsection (19)(b) or (19)(c), an additional
fee of $9 must be collected for each light vehicle registered under this part. This fee must be accounted for and
transmitted separately from the registration fee. Of the $9 fee:
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – SB 324

Amendment - 1st Reading-white - Requested by: Conference Committee on SB 324
- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 Drafter: Megan Moore, SB0324.003.003
(i) $6.74 must be deposited in the state special revenue account established in 23-1-105 and
used for state parks;
(ii) 50 cents must be deposited in an account in the state special revenue fund to the credit of the
department of fish, wildlife, and parks and used for fishing access sites;
(iii) $1.37 must be deposited in the trails and recreation facilities state special revenue account
established in 23-2-108; and
(iv) 39 cents must be deposited in the Montana heritage preservation and development account
established in 22-3-1004 and used for the operation of state-owned facilities at Virginia City and Nevada City.
(b) A person who registers a light vehicle may, at the time of annual registration, certify that the
person does not intend to use the vehicle to visit state parks and fishing access sites and may make a written
election not to pay the additional $9 fee provided for in subsection (19)(a). If a written election is made, the fee
may not be collected.
(c) (i) A person who registers one or more light vehicles may, at the time of annual registration,
certify that the person does not intend to use any of the vehicles to visit state parks and fishing access sites and
may make a written election not to pay the additional $9 fee provided for in subsection (19)(a). If a written
election is made, the fee may not be collected at any subsequent annual registration unless the person makes
the written election to pay the additional fee on one or more of the light vehicles.
(ii) The written election not to pay the additional fee on a light vehicle expires if the vehicle is
registered to a different person.
(20) For each light vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, pole trailer, heavy truck, motor home, motorcycle,
quadricycle, and travel trailer subject to a registration fee under this section, an additional fee of $10 must be
collected and forwarded to the state for deposit as follows:
(a) $8 must be deposited in the account established in 44-1-504; AND
(b) $2 must be deposited in the account established in [section 4 ].
(21) (a) If a person exercises the option in subsection (21)(b), an additional fee of $5 must be
collected for each light vehicle registered under this part. This fee must be accounted for and transmitted
separately from the registration fee. The fee must be deposited in an account in the state special revenue fund.
Funds in the account are statutorily appropriated, as provided in 17-7-502, to the department of transportation
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – SB 324

Amendment - 1st Reading-white - Requested by: Conference Committee on SB 324
- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 Drafter: Megan Moore, SB0324.003.003
and must be allocated as provided in 60-3-309.
(b) A person who registers one or more light vehicles may, at the time of annual registration, make
a written or electronic election to pay the additional $5 fee provided for in subsection (21)(a).
(22) This section does not apply to a motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer that is
governed by 61-3-721.
(23) (a) The $800 and $825 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, the total amounts collected
PURSUANT TO based on the manufacturer's suggested retail price in BASED ON THE MANUFACTURER'S SUGGESTED
RETAIL PRICE IN subsections (2) and (7) are exempt from the provisions of 15-1-122 and must be deposited as
follows:
(I) THE FIRST $2 MILLION EACH YEAR MUST BE DEPOSITED IN THE ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO
[SECTION 4]; AND
(i)(II) 38% must be deposited 26% 46% OF THE REMAINDER in the account established in 44-1-504;
and
(ii)(III) 62% must be deposited 74% 54% OF THE REMAINDER in the motor vehicle division
administration account established in 61-3-112.
(b) For the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2026, and each fiscal year thereafter, the total amounts
collected based on the manufacturer's suggested retail price PURSUANT TO BASED ON THE MANUFACTURER'S
SUGGESTED RETAIL PRICE IN subsections (2) and (7) of this section are exempt from the provisions of 15-1-122
and must be deposited as follows:
(I) THE FIRST $2 MILLION EACH YEAR MUST BE DEPOSITED IN THE ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO
[SECTION 4];
(i)(II) 19% must be deposited 12% 22% OF THE REMAINDER in the account established in 44-1-504;
and
(ii)(III) 57% must be deposited 62% 78% OF THE REMAINDER in the motor vehicle division
administration account established in 61-3-112; and
(iii)(IV) 24% must be deposited 26% OF THE REMAINDER in the better local bridge fund established in
[section 5].
(b)(c) By EXCEPT FOR THE BIENNIUM BEGINNING JULY 1, 2025, AND ENDING JUNE 30, 2027, BY August 15
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – SB 324

Amendment - 1st Reading-white - Requested by: Conference Committee on SB 324
- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 Drafter: Megan Moore, SB0324.003.003
of each year, beginning in the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2019, the department of justice shall deposit into the
general fund an amount equal to the fiscal yearend balance minus 25% of the current fiscal year appropriation
for the account established in 61-3-112, subject to the following conditions if the amount in this subsection
(23)(c) is:
(i) $1.5 million or less, then that amount must be deposited into the general fund; and
(ii) greater than $1.5 million, then $1.5 million must be deposited into the general fund and the
remainder above $1.5 million may be retained in the account established in 61-3-112.
(24) Beginning January 1, 2027, the manufacturer's suggested retail price in subsections (2)(b) and
(7)(c) must be increased annually by an inflation factor of 2%, rounded to the nearest dollar. The resulting price
s are effective for the year of the adjustment and must be used as the basis for the imposition of the fee in
subsections (2)(b) and (7)(c). The product of the inflation adjustment after rounding is the starting point for each
annual inflationary increase.
(24) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, THE MANUFACTURER'S SUGGESTED RETAIL PRICE IN SUBSECTIONS
(2)(B) AND (7)(C) MUST BE INCREASED ANNUALLY BY AN INFLATION FACTOR OF 2%, ROUNDED TO THE NEAREST DOLLAR.
THE RESULTING PRICES ARE EFFECTIVE FOR THE YEAR OF THE ADJUSTMENT AND MUST BE USED AS THE BASIS FOR THE
IMPOSITION OF THE FEE IN SUBSECTIONS (2)(B) AND (7)(C). THE PRODUCT OF THE INFLATION ADJUSTMENT AFTER
ROUNDING IS THE STARTING POINT FOR EACH ANNUAL INFLATIONARY INCREASE.
(24)(25)(24)(25) For the purposes of this section, "manufacturer's suggested retail price" means
the price suggested by a manufacturer for each given type, style, or model of a light vehicle or motor home
produced and first made available for retail sale by the manufacturer."

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Victims of crime state special revenue account -- administration by
board of crime control. (1) There is an account in the state special revenue fund provided for in 17-2-102 to
be known as the victims of crime state special revenue account.
(2) There must be deposited in the account money received pursuant to 61-3-321(20)(23).
(3) The money deposited in the account is allocated to the board of crime control to fund services
related to victims of crime.

- 10 - Authorized Print Version – SB 324

Amendment - 1st Reading-white - Requested by: Conference Committee on SB 324
- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 Drafter: Megan Moore, SB0324.003.003
NEW SECTION. Section 5. Better local bridge state special revenue account -- rulemaking. (1)
There is an account in the state special revenue fund provided for in 17-2-102 to be known as the better local
bridge fund account.
(2) There must be deposited in the account money received pursuant to 61-3-321.
(3) The account may be used for:
(a) grants to local government for the costs associated with engineering and construction of local,
off-system bridges; and
(b) administrative costs for the department of transportation, not to exceed 5% of revenue
received.
(4) Grants to local governments must include no less than 20% local matching funds.
(5) The department shall enact rules for distribution of annual grants to local governments.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Repealer. The following section of the Montana Code Annotated is
repealed:
61-3-111. Motor vehicle division administrative fees.

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Transfer of funds. By June 30, 2025, there is transferred $50 million
from the general fund to the better local bridge fund account provided for in [section 5].

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Codification instruction. (1) [Section 4] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 44, chapter 7, part 1, and the provisions of Title 44, chapter 7, part 1, apply to [section 4].
(2) [Section 5] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 60, chapter 2, part 2, and the
provisions of Title 60, chapter 2, part 2, apply to [section 5].

COORDINATION SECTION. SECTION 9. COORDINATION INSTRUCTION. IF EITHER HOUSE BILL NO. 924 OR
SENATE BILL NO. 287 AND [THIS ACT] ARE PASSED AND APPROVED AND IF EITHER AND [THIS ACT] CONTAIN A PROVISION
TRANSFERRING MONEY INTO THE BETTER LOCAL BRIDGE FUND ACCOUNT, THEN [SECTION 7 OF THIS ACT] IS VOID.

- 11 - Authorized Print Version – SB 324

Amendment - 1st Reading-white - Requested by: Conference Committee on SB 324
- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 Drafter: Megan Moore, SB0324.003.003
NEW SECTION. Section 6. Effective dates date. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3),
[this [This act] is effective January 1, 2026.
(2) [Sections 5 and 7] and this section are effective on passage and approval.
(3) [Sections 2 and 6] are effective June 30, 2027.
- END -
- 12 - Authorized Print Version – SB 324